Maine, session 132, LD96.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §2525, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2011, c. 335, §14, is further
amended to read:
1. Submission to test required. If a drug recognition expert law enforcement officer
has probable cause to believe that a person is under the influence of a drug, drugs, a specific
category of drug, a combination of specific categories of drugs or a combination of alcohol
and one or more specific categories of drugs, that person must submit to a blood or urine
test tests selected by the drug recognition expert law enforcement officer to confirm that
person's category of drug or alcohol use and determine the presence or level of the any
drug, drug metabolite or alcohol.
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §2525, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Suspension of license for refusal. The Secretary of State, in accordance with the
procedures described in section 2521, shall immediately suspend the license of a person
who fails to submit to and complete a test administered under this section.